Wyoming statutes. Title 4 Trusts
Article 8. Duties and Powers of Trustee

Law reviews. —

For article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” See 8 Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

§ 4-10-801.
Duty to administer trust.

Upon acceptance of a trusteeship, the trustee shall administer the trust in good faith, in accordance with its terms and purposes and the interests of the beneficiaries, and in accordance with this act.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 4-10-103(a)(xxvi).

§ 4-10-802.
Duty of loyalty.

A trustee shall administer the trust solely in the interests of the beneficiaries as their interests are defined under the terms of the trust.

Subject to the rights of persons dealing with a fiduciary as provided in W.S.

4-10-1013

, a sale, encumbrance or other transaction involving the investment or management of trust property entered into by the trustee for the trustee’s own personal account or which is otherwise affected by a conflict between the trustee’s fiduciary and personal interests is voidable by a beneficiary affected by the transaction unless:

The transaction was authorized by the terms of the trust;

The transaction was approved by the court;

The beneficiary did not commence a judicial proceeding within the time allowed by W.S.

4-10-1005

;

The beneficiary consented to the trustee’s conduct, ratified the transaction or released the trustee pursuant to W.S.

4-10-1009

; or

The transaction involves a contract entered into or claim acquired by the trustee before the person became or contemplated becoming trustee.

A sale, encumbrance or other transaction involving the investment or management of trust property is presumed to be affected by a conflict between personal and fiduciary interests if it is entered into by the trustee with:

The trustee’s spouse;

The trustee’s descendants, siblings, parents or their spouses;

An agent or attorney of the trustee; or

A corporation or other person or enterprise in which the trustee, or a person that owns a significant interest in the trustee, has an interest that might affect the trustee’s best judgment.

A transaction between a trustee and a beneficiary that does not concern trust property but that occurs during the existence of the trust or while the trustee retains significant influence over the beneficiary and from which the trustee obtains an advantage beyond the normal commercial advantage from such a transaction, is voidable by the beneficiary unless the trustee establishes that the transaction was fair to the beneficiary.

A transaction not concerning trust property in which the trustee engages in the trustee’s individual capacity involves a conflict between personal and fiduciary interests if the transaction concerns an opportunity properly belonging to the trust.

An investment by a trustee in securities of an investment company or investment trust to which the trustee, or its affiliate, provides services in a capacity other than as trustee is not presumed to be affected by a conflict between personal and fiduciary interests if the investment complies with the prudent investor rule as specified under article 9 of this act [§

4-10-901

et seq.]. The trustee may be compensated by the investment company or investment trust for providing those services out of fees charged to the trust if, as a condition precedent to receipt of such compensation, and at least annually, the trustee notifies the persons entitled under W.S.

4-10-813

to receive a copy of the trustee’s annual report of the rate and method by which the compensation is determined by delivery of a prospectus or other communication.

In voting shares of stock or in exercising powers of control over similar interests in other forms of enterprise, the trustee shall act in the best interests of the beneficiaries. If the trust is the sole owner of a corporation or other form of enterprise, the trustee shall elect or appoint directors or other managers who will manage the corporation or enterprise in the best interests of the beneficiaries.

This section does not preclude the following transactions, if fair to the beneficiaries:

An agreement between a trustee and a majority of the qualified beneficiaries relating to the appointment or compensation of the trustee;

Payment of reasonable compensation to the trustee;

A transaction between a trust and another trust, decedent’s estate or conservatorship of which the trustee is a fiduciary or in which a beneficiary has an interest;

A deposit of trust money in a regulated financial services institution operated by the trustee; or

An advance by the trustee of money for the protection of the trust.

The court may appoint a special fiduciary to make a decision with respect to any proposed transaction that might violate this section if entered into by the trustee.

There is no presumption of a conflict of interest when a trustee:

Makes an investment in an insurance contract purchased from an insurance agency owned by, or affiliated with, the trustee, or any of its affiliates; or

Places securities through a securities broker that is part of the same company as the trustee, is owned by the trustee or is affiliated with the trustee provided the investment complies with the prudent investor rule contained in the Uniform Prudent Investor Act under W.S.

4-10-901

through

4-10-913

and the trustee at least annually notifies qualified beneficiaries of the rate and method by which the trustee receives compensation.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1; 2005, ch. 126, § 2; 2021 ch. 53, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment

, added (k).

Laws 2005, ch. 126, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2005.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added "as their interests are defined under the terms of the trust" in (a).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 4-10-103(a)(xxvi).

Transactions in which sisters disclaimed their interest in trust property were not voidable. —

Judgment was properly awarded to a brother in sisters'
action claiming that the brother, as trustee of a family trust, wrongfully induced them to disclaim their interest in a large portion of trust property because the transactions were not voidable; the sisters did not dispute that they signed the documents indicating their consent to the brother taking title to the trust property.
Mendoza v. Gonzales, 2009 WY 50, 204 P.3d 995,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 2009).

§ 4-10-803.
Impartiality.

If a trust has two (2) or more beneficiaries, the trustee shall act impartially in investing, managing and distributing the trust property, giving due regard to the beneficiaries’ respective interests.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 4-10-804.
Prudent administration.

A trustee shall administer the trust as a prudent person would, by considering the purposes, terms, distributional requirements and other circumstances of the trust. In satisfying this standard, the trustee shall exercise reasonable care, skill and caution.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

Court's improper refusal to confirm sale of trust property. —

Where a trust agreement did not require approval by defendant beneficiaries, or by the court, of the trustee's sale of property, the trial court improperly refused to confirm a sale agreement between the trustee and intervenor potential purchaser, based solely on the finding that the property had a higher value a year later, where the court found that the sale agreement was prudent when made, as Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 4-8-103 (repealed 2003) applied the prudent investor standard. Rock Springs Land & Timber, Inc. v. Lore, 2003 WY 100, 75 P.3d 614,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. Sept. 30, 2003).

§ 4-10-805.
Costs of administration.

In administering a trust, the trustee may incur only costs that are reasonable in relation to the trust property, the purposes of the trust and the skills of the trustee.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 4-10-806.
Trustee's skills.

A trustee who has special skills or expertise, or is named trustee in reliance upon the trustee’s representation that the trustee has special skills or expertise, shall use those special skills or expertise.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 4-10-807.
Delegation by trustee.

A trustee may delegate duties and powers that a prudent trustee of comparable skills could properly delegate under the circumstances. The trustee shall exercise reasonable care, skill and caution in:

Selecting an agent;

Establishing the scope and terms of the delegation, consistent with the purposes and terms of the trust; and

Periodically reviewing the agent’s actions in order to monitor the agent’s performance and compliance with the terms of the delegation.

In performing a delegated function, an agent owes a duty to the trust to exercise reasonable care to comply with the terms of the delegation.

A trustee who complies with subsection (a) of this section is not liable to the beneficiaries or to the trust for an action of the agent to whom the function was delegated.

By accepting a delegation of powers or duties from the trustee of a trust that is subject to the law of the state of Wyoming, an agent submits to the jurisdiction of the courts of the state of Wyoming even if the agency agreement provides otherwise, and the agent may be made a party to any action or proceeding if the issues relate to a decision, action or inaction of the agent.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 4-10-808.
Powers to direct.

While a trust is revocable, the trustee may follow a written direction of the settlor that is contrary to the terms of the trust.

If the terms of a trust confer upon a person other than the settlor of a revocable trust power to direct certain actions of the trustee, the trustee shall act in accordance with an exercise of the power.

The terms of a trust may confer upon a trustee or other person, as provided in article 7 of this act [§

4-10-701

et seq.], a power to direct the modification or termination of the trust.

A person, other than a beneficiary, who holds a power to direct is a fiduciary who, as such, is required to act in good faith with regard to the purposes of the trust and the interests of the beneficiaries. The holder of a power to direct is liable for any loss that results from breach of a fiduciary duty with respect to the holder’s power.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1; 2007, ch. 155, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, rewrote (b) deleting the condition of the attempted exercise.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 4-10-103(a)(xxvi).

§ 4-10-809.
Control and protection of trust property.

A trustee shall take reasonable steps to take control of and protect the trust property.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 4-10-810.
Record keeping and identification of trust property.

A trustee shall keep adequate records of the administration of the trust.

A trustee shall keep trust property separate from the trustee’s own property.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section, a trustee shall cause the trust property to be designated or titled as provided in W.S.

4-10-402

so that the interest of the trust, to the extent feasible, appears in records maintained by a party other than a trustee or beneficiary.

If the trustee maintains records clearly indicating the respective interests, a trustee may invest as a whole the property of two (2) or more separate trusts.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 4-10-811.
Enforcement and defense of claims.

A trustee shall take reasonable steps to enforce claims of the trust and to defend claims against the trust.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 4-10-812.
Collecting trust property.

A trustee shall take reasonable steps to compel a former trustee or other person to deliver trust property to the trustee, and may redress a breach of trust known to the trustee to have been committed by a former trustee.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 4-10-813.
Duty to inform and report.

A trustee shall keep the qualified beneficiaries of the trust reasonably informed about the administration of the trust and of the material facts necessary for them to protect their interests. Unless unreasonable under the circumstances, a trustee shall promptly respond to a qualified beneficiary’s request for information related to the administration of the trust.

A trustee shall comply with the following provisions unless the trust instrument specifically directs, limits or waives this requirement of a trustee:

Upon request of any qualified beneficiary, the trustee shall promptly furnish to the beneficiary a copy of the trust instrument;

Within sixty (60) days after accepting a trusteeship, the trustee shall notify the qualified beneficiaries of the acceptance and of the trustee’s name, address and telephone number;

Within sixty (60) days after the date the trustee acquires knowledge of the creation of an irrevocable trust, or the date the trustee acquires knowledge that a formerly revocable trust has become irrevocable, whether by the death of the settlor or otherwise, the trustee shall notify the qualified beneficiaries of the trust’s existence, of the identity of the settlor or settlors, of the right to request a copy of the trust instrument and of the right to a trustee’s report as provided in subsection (c) of this section; and

The trustee shall notify the qualified beneficiaries in advance of any change in the method or rate of the trustee’s compensation.

A trustee shall send to qualified beneficiaries, at least annually and at the termination of the trust, a report of the trust property, liabilities, receipts and disbursements, including the amount of the trustee’s compensation, except to the extent compensation has been disclosed consistent with the requirements of W.S.

4-10-802

, the allocation of receipts, disbursements, trustee compensation and expenses of administration between income and principal, a listing of the trust assets and, if feasible, their respective market values. Upon a vacancy in a trusteeship, unless a cotrustee remains in office, a report shall be sent to the qualified beneficiaries by the former trustee. A personal representative, conservator or guardian of a deceased or incapacitated trustee may send the qualified beneficiaries a report on the trustee’s behalf.

A beneficiary may waive the right to a trustee’s report or other information otherwise required to be furnished under this section. A beneficiary, with respect to future reports and other information, may withdraw a waiver previously given.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1; 2005, ch. 126, § 2.

The 2005 amendment

in (c), inserted “except to the extent compensation has been disclosed consistent with the requirements of W.S.

4-10-802

” after “trustee’s compensation.”

Laws 2005, ch. 126, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2005.

§ 4-10-814.
Discretionary powers; tax savings; distribution limitations.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 155, § 5.

Subject to subsection (d) of this section, and unless the terms of the trust expressly indicate that a rule in this subsection does not apply:

A person other than a settlor who is a beneficiary and trustee of a trust that confers on the trustee a power to make discretionary distributions to or for the trustee’s personal benefit may exercise the power only in accordance with an ascertainable standard; and

A trustee may not exercise a power to make discretionary distributions to satisfy a legal obligation of support that the trustee personally owes another person.

A power, the exercise of which is limited or prohibited by subsection (b) of this section may be exercised by a majority of the remaining trustees whose exercise of the power is not so limited or prohibited. If the power of all trustees is so limited or prohibited, the trustee may appoint a special fiduciary with authority to exercise the power.

Subsection (b) of this section does not apply to:

A power held by the settlor’s spouse who is the trustee of a trust for which a marital deduction, as defined in Section 2056(b)(5) or 2523(e) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as in effect on July 1, 2003, was previously allowed;

Any trust during any period that the trust may be revoked or amended by its settlor; or

Contributions to a trust that qualify for the annual exclusion under Section 2503(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as in effect on July 1, 2003, or which are subject to an annual withdrawal right.

A court may review a trustee’s exercise of discretion concerning a discretionary distribution only if the trustee acts dishonestly, with improper motive or fails to use judgment.

Except as otherwise provided in the terms of a trust, the trustee shall not consider the assets or resources of a beneficiary in determining whether to make a distribution of trust income or principal.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1; 2005, ch. 126, § 2; 2007, ch. 155, §§ 2, 5; 2019 ch. 44, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 53, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment

deleted “relating to the trustee's individual health, education, support or maintenance within the meaning of Section 2041(b)(1)(A) or 2514(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as in effect on July 1, 2003” at the end of (b)(i).

Laws 2005, ch. 126, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2005.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (c), substituted “the exercise of which” for “whose exercise,” and substituted “trustee” for “court”; and repealed former (a), which pertained to the exercise of discretionary power by a trustee.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (e).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added "; distribution limitations" in the section heading; and added (f).

Internal Revenue Code. —

The Internal Revenue Code, referred to in this section, is Title 26 of the U.S. Code.

§ 4-10-815.
General powers of trustee.

A trustee, without authorization by the court, may exercise:

Powers conferred by the terms of the trust; and

Except as limited by the terms of the trust:

All powers over the trust property which an unmarried competent owner has over individually owned property;

Any other powers appropriate to achieve the proper investment, management and distribution of the trust property; and

Any other powers conferred by this act.

The exercise of a power under this act is subject to the fiduciary duties prescribed by this article.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 4-10-103(a)(xxvi).

§ 4-10-816.
Specific powers of trustee.

Without limiting the authority conferred by W.S.

4-10-815

, a trustee may:

Collect trust property and accept or reject additions to the trust property from a settlor or any other person;

Acquire or sell property, for cash or on credit, at public or private sale;

Exchange, partition or otherwise change the character of trust property;

Deposit trust money in an account in a regulated financial services institution;

Borrow money, with or without security, and mortgage or pledge trust property for a period within or extending beyond the duration of the trust;

With respect to an interest in a proprietorship, partnership, limited liability company, business trust, corporation or other form of business or enterprise, continue the business or other enterprise and take any action that may be taken by shareholders, partners, members or property owners, including merging, dissolving or otherwise changing the form of business organization or contributing additional capital;

With respect to stocks or other securities, exercise the rights of an absolute owner, including the right to:

Vote, or give proxies to vote, with or without power of substitution, or enter into or continue a voting trust agreement;

Hold a security in the name of a nominee or in other form without disclosure of the trust so that title may pass by delivery;

Pay calls, assessments and other sums chargeable or accruing against the securities, and sell or exercise stock subscription or conversion rights;

Exercise stock options and other rights; and

Deposit the securities with a depositary or other regulated financial services institution.

With respect to an interest in real property, construct, or make ordinary or extraordinary repairs to, alterations to, or improvements in, buildings or other structures, demolish improvements, raze existing or erect new party walls or buildings, subdivide or develop land, dedicate land to public use or grant public or private easements and make or vacate plats and adjust boundaries;

Enter into a lease for any purpose as lessor or lessee, including a lease or other arrangement for exploration and removal of natural resources, with or without the option to purchase or renew, for a period within or extending beyond the duration of the trust;

Grant an option involving a sale, lease or other disposition of trust property or acquire an option for the acquisition of property, including an option exercisable beyond the duration of the trust, and exercise an option so acquired;

Insure the property of the trust against damage or loss and insure the trustee, the trustee’s agents and beneficiaries against liability arising from the administration of the trust;

Abandon or decline to administer property of no value or of insufficient value to justify its collection or continued administration;

With respect to possible liability for violation of environmental law:

Inspect or investigate property the trustee holds or has been asked to hold, or property owned or operated by an organization in which the trustee holds or has been asked to hold an interest, for the purpose of determining the application of environmental law with respect to the property;

Take action to prevent, abate or otherwise remedy any actual or potential violation of any environmental law affecting property held directly or indirectly by the trustee, whether taken before or after the assertion of a claim or the initiation of governmental enforcement;

Decline to accept property into trust or disclaim any power with respect to property that is or may be burdened with liability for violation of environmental law;

Compromise claims against the trust which may be asserted for an alleged violation of environmental law; and

Pay the expense of any inspection, review, abatement or remedial action to comply with environmental law.

Pay or contest any claim, settle a claim by or against the trust and release, in whole or in part, a claim belonging to the trust;

Pay taxes, assessments, compensation of the trustee and of employees and agents of the trust and other expenses incurred in the administration of the trust;

Exercise elections with respect to federal, state and local taxes;

Select a mode of payment under any employee benefit or retirement plan, annuity or life insurance payable to the trustee, exercise rights thereunder, including exercise of the right to indemnification for expenses and against liabilities, and take appropriate action to collect the proceeds;

Make loans out of trust property, including loans to a beneficiary on terms and conditions the trustee considers to be fair and reasonable under the circumstances, and the trustee has a lien on future distributions for repayment of those loans;

Pledge trust property to guarantee loans made by others to the beneficiary;

Appoint a trustee to act in another jurisdiction with respect to trust property located in the other jurisdiction, confer upon the appointed trustee all of the powers and duties of the appointing trustee, require that the appointed trustee furnish security and remove any trustee so appointed;

Pay an amount distributable to a beneficiary who is under a legal disability or who the trustee reasonably believes is incapacitated, by paying it directly to the beneficiary or applying it for the beneficiary’s benefit, or by:

Paying it to the beneficiary’s conservator or, if the beneficiary does not have a conservator, the beneficiary’s guardian;

Paying it to the beneficiary’s custodian under the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act or custodial trustee under the Uniform Custodial Trust Act and, for that purpose, creating a custodianship or custodial trust;

If the trustee does not know of a conservator, guardian, custodian or custodial trustee, paying it to the person’s agent under a power of attorney or, if none, to an adult relative or other person having legal or physical care or custody of the beneficiary, to be expended on the beneficiary’s behalf;

Managing it as a separate fund on the beneficiary’s behalf, subject to the beneficiary’s continuing right to withdraw the distribution; and

Creating or funding a plan under Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, in effect on July 1, 2003, for the beneficiary’s benefit.

On distribution of trust property or the division or termination of a trust, make distributions in divided or undivided interests, allocate particular assets in proportionate or disproportionate shares, value the trust property for those purposes and adjust for resulting differences in valuation;

Resolve a dispute concerning the interpretation of the trust or its administration by mediation, arbitration, or other procedure for alternative dispute resolution;

Prosecute or defend an action, claim or judicial proceeding in any jurisdiction to protect trust property and the trustee in the performance of the trustee’s duties;

Sign and deliver contracts and other instruments that are useful to achieve or facilitate the exercise of the trustee’s powers;

Purchase and pay from trust principal the premiums on life insurance;

On termination of the trust, exercise the powers appropriate to wind up the administration of the trust and distribute the trust property to the persons entitled to it; and

Distribute all or any portion of trust income or principal in further trust for the benefit of the trust beneficiaries pursuant to authority granted in the trust instrument to make discretionary or mandatory distributions of trust income or principal to the trust beneficiaries, whether or not the discretionary or mandatory distributions are pursuant to an ascertainable standard;

Make a distribution of trust income to or for the benefit of a beneficiary or pay trust expenses from a trust with two (2) or more subtrusts or shares for the beneficiary from any subtrust or share requiring or permitting income distributions to the beneficiary;

Separate a trust for the benefit of more than one (1) beneficiary into separate trusts or shares for each beneficiary, unless the trust instrument requires the trust property to be held in one (1) trust for the beneficiaries;

Exercise elections with respect to federal, state and local taxes; and

Decide each trust taxable year whether principal distributions made from a trust to a beneficiary include net realized capital gains and losses in section 643(a) of the Internal Revenue Code distributable net income.

The power provided in paragraph (a)(xxviii) of this section shall not be exercised in any manner that would prevent qualification for a federal estate or gift tax marital deduction, federal estate or gift tax charitable deduction, or other federal income, estate, gift or generation-skipping transfer tax benefit claimed for the trust from which the distribution in further trust is made. If the trustee making a distribution in further trust under paragraph (a)(xxviii) of this section is a beneficiary of the trust from which the distribution in further trust is made, the distribution in further trust may not change the trustee’s interest as a beneficiary in the trust. A trustee shall not be liable for exercising the power permitted under paragraph (a)(xxviii) of this section if the power is exercised in good faith.

This section may be cited as the Uniform Trustee Powers Act.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1; 2005, ch. 126, § 2; 2013 ch. 178, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2015 ch. 88, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 37, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

For the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act, see §

34-13-114

et seq.

The 2005 amendment

added (b).

Laws 2005, ch. 126, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2005.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, at end of (a)(xxvi) deleted “and”; inserted “and” at end of (a)(xxvii); and added (a)(xxviii).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(xxviii), substituted “Distribute all or any portion” for “On distribution,” inserted “in further trust for the benefit of the trust beneficiaries,” inserted “granted” preceding “in the trust,” inserted “or mandatory” following “discretionary” twice, substituted “the trust beneficiaries” for “a trust beneficiary,” and deleted “make distributions of all or any portion of trust income or principal in further trust” at the end of the clause; in (b), added the second sentence.

Authority of trustee.—

Construction.—

Authority to decant trust property. —

Authority of trustee.—

Settlors amended the trustee’s powers by specifically authorizing the trustee to exercise all the fiduciary powers provided in the Wyoming Uniform Trust Code, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

4-10-801

et seq., as amended. Accordingly, through the settlors’ express adoption of the fiduciary powers enumerated in the Wyoming Uniform Trust Code, the settlors granted the successor trustee the authority to sell trust property, for cash or on credit, at public or private sale. Jackson v. Montoya, 2020 WY 116, 471 P.3d 984,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 2020).

Construction.—

Although the statute grants Wyoming trustees significant decanting powers, nothing in the statute permits beneficiaries unilateral authority to decant a trust for which they stand to benefit. Gowdy v. Cook, 2020 WY 3, 455 P.3d 1201,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 2020).

Authority to decant trust property. —

District court did not err in affirmatively answering the discrete legal question that the trustee had the general authority to decant trust property under this section and the trust agreement; however, the district court went beyond the discrete legal question presented and erred in resolving disputed issues of material fact concerning the appropriateness of the proposed decanting on a motion for judgment on the pleadings because the trust creator’s intent and the trust’s purpose were material in deciding the appropriateness of the proposed decanting, and a trust beneficiary disputed whether the proposed decanting was consistent with either. Evertson v. Evertson Fiduciary Mgmt. Corp. (In re Evertson Dynasty Trust), 2019 WY 84, 446 P.3d 705,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 2019).

Stated in

Willey v. Willey, 2016 WY 116, 385 P.3d 290,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 2016).

§ 4-10-817.
Distribution upon termination.

Upon termination or partial termination of a trust, the trustee may send to the beneficiaries a proposal for distribution. The right of any beneficiary to object to the proposed distribution terminates if the beneficiary does not notify the trustee of an objection within thirty (30) days after the proposal was sent but only if the proposal informed the beneficiary of the right to object and of the time allowed for objection.

Upon the occurrence of an event terminating or partially terminating a trust, the trustee shall proceed expeditiously to distribute the trust property to the persons entitled to it, subject to the right of the trustee to retain a reasonable reserve for the payment of debts, expenses and taxes.

A release by a beneficiary of a trustee from liability for breach of trust is invalid to the extent:

It was induced by improper conduct of the trustee; or

The beneficiary, at the time of the release, did not know of the beneficiary’s rights or of the material facts relating to the breach.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.